Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 26

Gas Companies

65-26-101. Power to lay pipes and conductors.

To enable gas companies to establish such works, they are empowered to lay pipes and extend conductors through the streets, lanes, and alleys of any town, city, or village, in such manner, however, as to produce the least possible inconvenience to the town, city, or village, or its inhabitants, or to travelers, and to take up pavements and sidewalks; provided, that they shall repair the same with the least possible delay; and provided further, that no one of the streets or alleys shall be entered upon or used by any corporation for laying pipes and conductors, or otherwise, until the consent of the municipal authorities shall have been obtained, and an ordinance shall have been passed prescribing the terms on which the same may be done.

Acts 1875, ch. 142, § 25; 1887, ch. 176, §§ 1, 2; Shan., § 2208; mod. Code 1932, § 3960; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2601.

Cross-References. Assessment of property for tax purposes, title 67, ch. 5, part 13.

Municipal gas companies, title 7, ch. 39.

Municipal power over franchises, § 6-54-109.

Privilege tax on gas, water and electric companies, § 67-4-405.

Situs of property for tax purposes, § 67-5-502.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Gas Companies, §§ 2, 7.

65-26-102. Sale of gas.

The corporation is authorized to charge a reasonable price for gas, not higher than the price allowed by existing charters to gas companies heretofore chartered in this state; provided, that the corporation shall never charge more than one cent (1¢) per every cubic foot of gas used, as may be indicated by the gas meter or computed by the ordinary rules in such cases; nor shall it at any time charge the authorities of the town, city, or village more per cubic foot than it is charging the inhabitants of such town, city or village at that time.

Acts 1875, ch. 142, § 25; Shan., § 2209; mod. Code 1932, § 3961; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2602.

Collateral References.

Franchise provisions for free or reduced rates of public service corporations as within constitutional or statutory provision prohibiting discrimination. 10 A.L.R. 504, 15 A.L.R. 1200.

65-26-103. Restrictions against nuisances.

The works and operations of the company shall be so constructed and managed that no annoyance shall accrue therefrom to the health and comfort of the inhabitants of the town; and nothing in this chapter shall be so construed as to absolve the company, its officers or agents, from any legal proceedings to restrain or abate any nuisance arising from such works or operations.

Acts 1875, ch. 142, § 25; Shan., § 2210; Code 1932, § 3962; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2603.

Cross-References. Abatement of nuisances, title 29, ch. 3.

Collateral References.

Right to maintain action to enjoin public nuisance as affected by existence of pollution control agency. 60 A.L.R.3d 665.

65-26-104. Damage or tampering with company property.

If any person shall injure or destroy any portion of the gas fixtures, or other property belonging to the company, or shall willfully open a communication into the street or other gas pipes, or let on gas after it has been stopped by the company, such person shall be liable for all damages sustained by such proceeding, and also to a penalty not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500), upon conviction before any court having jurisdiction of the offense.

Acts 1875, ch. 142, § 25; Shan., § 2211; Code 1932, § 3963; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2604.

65-26-105. Condemnation.

The corporation shall have the power of condemnation granted to electric companies in § 65-22-101.

Code 1932, § 3964; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2605.

Cross-References. Eminent domain, title 29, ch. 16.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Eminent Domain, § 7; 13 Tenn. Juris., Gas Companies, §§ 2, 8.